Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2312
Animal identification.

A domesticated cervine animal, or any part thereof, shall be appropriately marked for proof of ownership according to rules and regulations adopted by the department. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations specifying the acceptable forms of domesticated cervine animal identification in a manner which visibly distinguishes a domesticated cervine animal from wild cervidae. The department, in consultation with the commission, shall establish separate identification or proof of ownership requirements for transporting taken domesticated cervine animals.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 11.